Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.006

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Department" means the department of enterprise services.

(2) "Director" means the director of enterprise services.

(3) "Office of risk management" means the office within the department of enterprise services that carries out the powers and duties under this chapter relating to claim filing, claims administration, and claims payment.

(4) "Risk manager" means the person supervising the office of risk management.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 511; 2002 c 332 s 10; 1989 c 419 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 332: See notes following RCW 43.19.760.

Intent—1989 c 419: "In recent years the state of Washington has experienced significant increases in public liability claims. It is the intent of the legislature to reduce tort claim costs by restructuring Washington state's risk management program to place more accountability in state agencies, to establish an actuarially sound funding mechanism for paying legitimate claims, when they occur, and to establish an effective safety and loss control program." [ 1989 c 419 s 1.]

Effective date—1989 c 419: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1989." [ 1989 c 419 s 19.]